Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 3. Uninsured and Underinsured Motorists Coverage.

Collateral references. —

What constitutes automobile for purposes of uninsured motorist provisions, 65 ALR3d 851.

Choice of law as to validity of other insurance clause of uninsured motorist coverages, 83 ALR3d 321.

Operation or use of vehicle outside scope of permission as rendering it uninsured within meaning of uninsured motorist coverage, 17 A.L.R.4th 1322.

Combining or stacking uninsured motorist coverages provided in policies issued by different insurers to same insured, 21 ALR4th 211.

Combining or stacking uninsured motorist coverages provided in single policy applicable to different vehicles of individual insured, 23 ALR4th 12.

Combining or stacking uninsured motorist coverages provided in separate policies issued by same insurer to different insureds, 23 ALR4th 108.

Combining or stacking uninsured motorist coverages provided in separate policies issued by same insurer to same insured, 25 ALR4th 6.

Combining or stacking uninsured motorist coverages provided in fleet policy, 25 ALR4th 896.

Applicability of uninsured motorist statutes to self-insurers, 27 ALR4th 1266.

Combining or stacking uninsured motorist coverages provided in policies issued by different insurers to different insureds, 28 ALR4th 362.

Punitive damages as within coverage of uninsured or underinsured motorist insurance, 54 ALR4th 1186.

“Excess” or “umbrella” insurance policy as providing coverage for accidents with uninsured and underinsured motorists, 2 ALR5th 922.

Sec. 28.22.200.
Motor vehicle liability insurance required: Exemptions. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.201.
Uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage.

The uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage required under this chapter

does not apply to bodily injury, sickness, disease, or death of an insured or damage to or destruction of property of an insured until the limits of liability bonds and policies that apply have been used up by payments or judgments or settlements;

must be a single combined coverage; and

may be rejected by the insured in writing; if the insured has rejected uninsured or underinsured coverage, the coverage may not be included in a supplemental, renewal, or replacement policy unless the insured subsequently requests uninsured or underinsured coverage in writing.

If both the owner and operator of a vehicle are unknown, payment under the uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage may be made only where direct contact between the motor vehicles has occurred. A vehicle and operator that have left the scene of an accident with another vehicle are presumed to be uninsured if the insured person reports the accident to the appropriate authorities within 24 hours.

The uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage for damage to or destruction of property is subject to a deductible of $250 in any one accident, but the insurer may offer a deductible other than $250. This coverage shall be limited to damage to or destruction of the covered motor vehicle. It may not include loss of use of such vehicle.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Sec. 28.22.210.
Requirement of proof of motor vehicle liability. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.211.
Maximum liability of carrier. [Repealed, § 115 ch 81 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 28.22.220.
Method of proof following an accident. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.221.
Uninsured and underinsured motorists policy coverage and priorities.

If a person is entitled to uninsured or underinsured motorists coverage under more than one coverage when two or more vehicles are insured under one policy, the maximum amount payable may not exceed the highest limit of any one coverage under the policy. If a person is entitled to uninsured or underinsured motorists coverage under more than one motor vehicle policy issued by the same insurer in the same household, the maximum amount payable may be limited to the highest limit of any one coverage under the policies. If a person is entitled to uninsured or underinsured motorists coverage under more than one policy providing motor vehicle liability coverage, payments will be made in the following order of priority, subject to the limit of liability of each applicable policy or coverage:

a policy or coverage covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person or a policy or coverage covering a pedestrian as a named insured;

a policy or coverage covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person as an insured other than as a named insured;

a policy or coverage not covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person but covering the injured person as a named insured;

a policy or coverage not covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person but covering the injured person as an insured other than as a named insured;

a policy or coverage covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person or a policy or coverage covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, a pedestrian as a named insured;

a policy or coverage covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person or a policy or coverage covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, a pedestrian as an insured other than as a named insured;

a policy or coverage not covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person but covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, the injured person as a named insured;

a policy or coverage not covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person but covering, as excess, umbrella, or similar insurance, the injured person as an insured other than as a named insured.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 78 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 26, 2014, in the introductory language, , in the second sentence deleted “as a named insured” following “person is entitled”, substituted “motorists” for “motorist” and inserted “in the same household” following “by the same insurer”, in the third sentence, substituted “motorists” for “motorist”.

Sec. 28.22.230.
Method of proof following a charge of a moving traffic violation. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 28.22.231.
Policy coverage exclusions.

The uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage required under this chapter does not apply to bodily injury or death or damage to or destruction of property of an insured

while occupying a motor vehicle owned by, but not insured by, the named insured or the insured’s spouse or relative residing in the same household; or

through being struck by a vehicle owned by the named insured or the insured’s spouse or relative residing in the same household.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Secs. 28.22.240 — 28.22.260.
Administrative suspension of drivers’ licenses; falsification of information; proof for the future. [Repealed, § 17 ch 70 SLA 1984.]